New York, session 2025-2026, S1167.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 and subdivisions 7 and 8 of 2 section 11-104 of the energy law are REPEALED. 3 § 2. Subdivision 19 of section 378 of the executive law is REPEALED. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03694-01-5